District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-215.02

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-95, § 3, 23 DCR 9532b
Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-91, § 2, 27 DCR 3280
Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-167, § 2(a), 29 DCR 4983
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 117(c), 47 DCR 520

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1142.
1973 Ed., § 1-852.